Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.310

Termination or suspension of commission.

The commission shall be terminated or suspended if the director finds that apiarists and brokers voting in a referendum conducted as for an assessment increase in RCW 15.62.140(4) voted in favor of such termination or suspension. A referendum may be called by a majority of the commission or by twenty percent of the resident affected persons representing twenty percent of the colonies and industry products sold in Washington.

Any moneys in the treasury at the time of an affirmative termination or suspension vote shall first be used to effect all acts associated with the termination or suspension procedures and liquidation of the affairs of the commission.

Any residual funds not necessary to defray the expenses of termination or suspension of the commission shall be turned over to Washington State University to be used in conducting research on the honey bee Apis mellifera.

[ 1989 c 5 s 26.]